Hawaii statutes.
§226‑5 Objective and policies for
population. (a) It shall be the objective in planning for the State's
population to guide population growth to be consistent with the achievement of
physical, economic, and social objectives contained in this chapter.

(b) To achieve the population objective, it
shall be the policy of this State to:

(1) Manage population growth statewide in a manner
that provides increased opportunities for Hawaii's people to pursue their
physical, social, and economic aspirations while recognizing the unique needs
of each county.

(2) Encourage an increase in economic activities and
employment opportunities on the neighbor islands consistent with community
needs and desires.

(3) Promote increased opportunities for Hawaii's
people to pursue their socio-economic aspirations throughout the islands.

(4) Encourage research activities and public
awareness programs to foster an understanding of Hawaii's limited capacity to
accommodate population needs and to address concerns resulting from an increase
in Hawaii's population.

(5) Encourage federal actions and coordination among
major governmental agencies to promote a more balanced distribution of
immigrants among the states, provided that such actions do not prevent the
reunion of immediate family members.

(6) Pursue an increase in federal assistance for
states with a greater proportion of foreign immigrants relative to their
state's population.

(7) Plan the development and availability of land and
water resources in a coordinated manner so as to provide for the desired levels
of growth in each geographic area. [L 1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L 1986, c 276,
§4; am L 1988, c 70, §3; am L 1993, c 213, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next